Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2486.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1535. Student Mental Health Supports.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each school entity shall:(1) Adopt a comprehensive student mental health support policy consistent with subsection (c), inform each school entity employe and the parent or legal guardian of each student enrolled in the school entity of the policy and post the policy on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website. The 12345678910111213141516171819 policy adopted by a school entity under this paragraph may be based upon the model policy developed by the department under subsection (b)(1).(2) Include in the professional development plan submitted by the school entity to the secretary for approval pursuant to section 1205.1 four (4) hours of training in comprehensive student mental health support every five (5) years for professional educators in school buildings serving students in grades six through twelve. The following shall apply:(i) Training under this paragraph may be used to satisfy a professional educator's continuing professional education requirement under section 1205.2.(ii) A school entity may use the materials made available by the department under subsection (b)(2) to conduct the training.(b) The department shall:(1) Develop, in consultation with a youth mental health organization operating in this Commonwealth, a model student mental health support policy which shall be consistent with subsection (c).(2) Compile, develop and post on its publicly accessible Internet website the following, which may include materials already publicly available:(i) Recommended guidelines and educational materials for the training required under subsection (a)(2).(ii) Recommended resources and age-appropriate educational materials on student mental health.(3) Develop a model student mental health curriculum and make the curriculum available to all school entities and, upon request, to nonpublic schools. A school entity may incorporate the curriculum into its existing instructional program pursuant 20260HB2486PN3358 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the school entity's student mental health support policy.(c) The model policy developed by the department under subsection (b)(1) and any policy adopted by a school entity under subsection (a)(1) shall include the following:(1) A guide on student mental health supports available to students.(2) Protocols for administering the student mental health support policy to staff and students.(3) Procedures for identification and referral of students in need of student mental health support.(4) Methods of intervention, including procedures that involve caregivers and staff in addressing student mental health support.(5) Reporting procedures.(6) Recommended resources for student mental health support, including current contact information for such programs.(7) Procedures for identifying students who have experienced trauma or loss and a protocol for providing student mental health support that includes evidence-based programming tailored to trauma or grief.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit school, other than a school entity, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et 20260HB2486PN3358 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 seq.)."Professional educator." As defined in section 1205.2(o)."School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2486PN3358 - 4 - 1234567